Nevada, session 83, SB107.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 233 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. “Administrator” means the Administrator of the
Commission.
Sec. 3. “Aggrieved person” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 30 of this act.
-
*SB107*

– 4 –
Sec. 4. “Commission” means the Nevada Equal Rights
Commission within the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation.
Sec. 5. 1. “Complainant” means a person by whom, or on
whose behalf, a complaint is made which alleges an unlawful
discriminatory practice over which the Commission has
jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter.
2. As used in this section, “person” includes the Commission.
Sec. 6. “Conciliation” means the attempted resolution of
issues raised by a complaint, or by the investigation of a
complaint, through informal negotiations involving the aggrieved
person, the respondent and the Commission.
Sec. 7. “Disability” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 118.045.
Sec. 8. “Familial status” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 118.065.
Sec. 9. “Member” means a member of the Commission.
Sec. 10. “Respondent” means a natural person or other
person against whom a complaint is made which alleges an
unlawful discriminatory practice and over which the Commission
has jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 11. “Unlawful discriminatory practice in housing” has
the meaning ascribed to it in section 31 of this act.
Sec. 12. 1. When a complaint is filed in which allegations,
if true, would support a finding of an unlawful discriminatory
practice in housing:
(a) The Commission shall, to the extent practicable throughout
the complaint process, engage in conciliation with respect to the
complaint. If an agreement is reached with regard to the matters
alleged in the complaint, no further action may be taken by the
complainant or the Commission with regard to the matters alleged
in the complaint.
(b) Each conciliation agreement between a complainant and a
respondent must be approved by the Commission. The
Commission may reject any conciliation agreement that it
determines is not in the public interest. A conciliation agreement
may provide for binding arbitration of the matters alleged in the
complaint and for the awarding of any appropriate relief in the
arbitration, including, without limitation, monetary relief.
(c) The Commission shall make a conciliation agreement
public, unless the complainant and the respondent agree that it
not be made public and the Commission determines that public
disclosure of the agreement would not further the purposes of this
chapter or NRS 118.010 to 118.120, inclusive, and sections 30 to
33, inclusive, of this act.
-
*SB107*

– 5 –
2. The Commission shall, at the conclusion of any
investigation required by NRS 233.157, prepare a final
investigative report containing:
(a) The name and the date of contact with each witness;
(b) A summary of and the dates of correspondence and other
contact with the complainant and the respondent;
(c) A summary description of other pertinent records;
(d) A summary of witness statements; and
(e) Answers to interrogatories.
 The Commission may amend the final investigative report if
additional evidence is discovered.
3. If, at the conclusion of an investigation required by NRS
233.157, the Administrator determines that there is not probable
cause to believe that an unlawful discriminatory practice in
housing has occurred or is about to occur, the Administrator shall
dismiss the complaint and notify the complainant and the
respondent.
4. If, at the conclusion of an investigation required by NRS
233.157, the Administrator determines that there is probable cause
to believe that an unlawful discriminatory practice in housing has
occurred or is about to occur, and attempts at conciliation have
failed:
(a) The Attorney General shall prepare a notice of hearing
that complies with the requirements of NRS 233B.121 and serve a
copy of the notice upon the complainant, the aggrieved person and
the respondent, together with a notice of the right, in lieu of the
hearing, to elect to have the matter determined in a civil action in
a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to section 13 of this act.
(b) Any aggrieved person may intervene as a party in the
proceeding.
5. Unless an election is made to have the matter determined
in a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to section 13 of this
act, the Commission shall hold a public hearing on the matter in
conformance with the requirements of chapter 233B of NRS,
except that the provisions of subsection 5 of NRS 233B.121 and
NRS 233B.124 do not apply to the hearing. The Attorney General
shall prepare and prosecute the complaint on behalf of the
complainant.
6. If, after a hearing held pursuant to subsection 5, the
Commission determines, based on a preponderance of the
evidence, that an unlawful discriminatory practice in housing has
occurred, the Commission shall serve a copy of its findings of fact
and conclusions of law upon the complainant, the aggrieved
persons and the respondent within 10 days after such a finding
and may:
-
*SB107*

– 6 –
(a) Order the respondent to cease and desist from the unlawful
practice;
(b) Order such injunctive or equitable relief as may be
appropriate;
(c) Award actual damages to the complainant;
(d) Impose upon the respondent:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a civil
penalty of not more than $16,000;
(2) If the respondent has been adjudged in a separate
action to have committed any violation of NRS 118.010 to 118.120,
inclusive, and sections 30 to 33, inclusive, of this act within the 5-
year period immediately preceding the filing of the complaint, a
civil penalty of not more than $37,500; or
(3) If the respondent has been adjudged in one or more
separate actions to have committed two or more violations of NRS
118.010 to 118.120, inclusive, and sections 30 to 33, inclusive, of
this act within the 7-year period immediately preceding the filing
of the complaint, a civil penalty of not more than $65,000; and
(e) Award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the
complainant.
7. If, after a hearing held pursuant to subsection 5, the
Commission determines, based on a preponderance of the
evidence, that an unlawful discriminatory practice in housing has
not occurred, the Commission:
(a) Shall dismiss the matter and make the dismissal public;
and
(b) May, upon motion of the respondent, award costs and
reasonable attorney’s fees to the respondent, if the Commission
determines that the complaint, had it been filed with a court,
would have violated and been grounds for sanctions under Rule
11 of the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure.
8. Any resolution of a complaint before a final order of the
Commission is issued following a hearing held pursuant to
subsection 5 must, to the extent practicable, be agreed to by the
aggrieved person.
9. If the respondent fails to comply with a final order of the
Commission, the Commission shall apply to the district court for
an order compelling compliance. If the court finds that the
respondent has violated the order by failing to cease and desist
from the unlawful practice, failing to make any payment ordered
or otherwise failing to comply with the order, the court shall
award the aggrieved person actual damages caused by the
noncompliance.
10. After the Commission has held a public hearing and
rendered a decision, the complainant is barred from proceeding on
-
*SB107*

– 7 –
the same facts and legal theory before any other administrative
body or officer.
Sec. 13. 1. If, pursuant to subsection 4 of section 12 of this
act, the Administrator determines that there is probable cause to
believe that an unlawful discriminatory practice in housing has
occurred or is about to occur, and attempts at conciliation have
failed, the complainant, the aggrieved person or the respondent
may, in lieu of a hearing before the Commission pursuant to
section 12 of this act, elect to have the claims of an unlawful
discriminatory practice in housing that were set forth in the
complaint decided by a court of competent jurisdiction.
2. An election made pursuant to subsection 1 must be made
in writing and be received by the Commission not later than 20
days after the date on which the notice of hearing was served
pursuant to subsection 4 of section 12 of this act.
3. The Attorney General may, if requested by the complainant
or the aggrieved person, prepare, file and litigate a civil action on
behalf of the complainant or the aggrieved person.
4. Any aggrieved person, with respect to the issues to be
determined in the civil action, may intervene as a matter of right
in the civil action.
5. If the court, based on a preponderance of the evidence,
determines that the defendant has committed or is about to commit
an unlawful discriminatory practice in housing, the court may:
(a) If the aggrieved person has not complied with discovery
orders entered by the court, award actual and punitive damages to
the complainant or the aggrieved person, except that the court
may not award monetary damages to an aggrieved person who
does not intervene;
(b) Award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the
complainant or the aggrieved person; and
(c) Order such other relief as the court determines appropriate,
including, without limitation:
(1) Ordering a permanent or temporary injunction;
(2) Issuing a temporary restraining order; or
(3) Enjoining the defendant from engaging in the unlawful
practice or ordering such other affirmative action as the court
determines appropriate.
6. If the court, based on a preponderance of the evidence,
determines that the defendant has not committed and is not about
to commit an unlawful discriminatory practice in housing, the
court shall dismiss the action and may, upon the motion of the
defendant, award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to
the defendant, if the court determines that the complaint was
-
*SB107*

– 8 –
prosecuted in violation of Rule 11 of the Nevada Rules of Civil
Procedure.
7. The Commission shall notify the complainant, all
aggrieved persons and the respondent of the court’s decision in
any action filed pursuant to this section.
Sec. 14. 1. An order of the Commission issued pursuant to
section 12 of this act in a complaint alleging an unlawful
discriminatory practice in housing is a final decision in a
contested case for the purpose of judicial review.
2. Any person identified as a party of record in a hearing
before the Commission on a complaint alleging an unlawful
discriminatory practice in housing who is aggrieved by a final
decision of the Commission may request judicial review.
3. A petition for judicial review must:
(a) Name as respondents the Commission and all parties of
record to the hearing;
(b) Be instituted by filing the petition in the district court in
and for Carson City, in and for the county in which the aggrieved
party resides or in and for the county in which the hearing
occurred; and
(c) Be filed within 30 days after service of the final decision of
the Commission.
4. A cross-petition for judicial review must be filed within 10
days after service of a petition for judicial review.
5. The Commission and any party wishing to participate in
the judicial review must file a statement of intent to participate in
the petition for judicial review and serve the statement upon the
petitioner and each named respondent within 20 days after service
of the petition.
6. The petition for judicial review and any cross-petition for
judicial review must be served upon the Commission and each
party of record within 45 days after the filing of the petition,
unless, upon a showing of good cause, the district court extends
the time for such service.
7. The Commission shall, within 30 days after receipt of
service of the petition for judicial review or such time as allowed
by the court, transmit to the court the original or a certified copy
of the entire record of the proceeding under review, including,
without limitation, a transcript of the evidence resulting in the
final decision of the Commission. The record may be shortened by
stipulation of the parties to the proceeding. If the court determines
that a party has unreasonably refused to stipulate to limit the
record, the court may assess any additional costs resulting from
the refusal against that party. The court may require or permit
subsequent corrections or additions to the record.
-
*SB107*

– 9 –
8. If, before submission to the court, an application is made
to the court for leave to present additional evidence, and it is
shown to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence
is material and that there were good reasons for failure to present
it in the proceeding before the Commission, the court may order
that the additional evidence be taken before the Commission upon
such conditions as the court determines appropriate. After receipt
of any additional evidence, the Commission:
(a) May modify its finding and decision; and
(b) Shall file the evidence and any modification, new finding
or decision with the court.
9. A petitioner or cross-petitioner who is seeking judicial
review shall serve and file a memorandum of points and
authorities within 40 days after the Commission gives written
notice to the parties that the record of the proceeding under review
has been filed with the court.
10. The respondent or cross-petitioner may serve and file a
reply memorandum of points and authorities within 30 days after
service of the memorandum of points and authorities.
11. The petitioner or cross-petitioner may serve and file a
reply memorandum of points and authorities within 30 days after
service of the reply memorandum.
12. Within 7 days after the expiration of the period within
which the petitioner is authorized to reply pursuant to subsection
11, any party may request a hearing. Unless a request for a
hearing has been filed, the matter shall be deemed submitted.
13. All memoranda of points and authorities filed in
proceedings involving petitions for judicial review must be in the
form provided for appellate briefs in Rule 28 of the Nevada Rules
of Appellate Procedure.
14. The court, for good cause, may extend the times allowed
in this section for filing memoranda.
15. Judicial review of a final decision of the Commission
must be:
(a) Conducted by the court without a jury; and
(b) Confined to the record.
 In cases concerning alleged irregularities in procedure before
the Commission that are not shown in the record, the court may
receive evidence concerning the irregularities.
16. The final decision of the Commission shall be deemed
reasonable and lawful until reversed or set aside in whole or in
part by the court. The burden of proof is on the party attacking or
resisting the decision to show that the final decision is invalid
pursuant to subsection 17.
-
*SB107*

– 10 –
17. The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the
Commission as to the weight of evidence on a question of fact. The
court may remand or affirm the final decision or set it aside in
whole or in part if substantial rights of the petitioner have been
prejudiced because the final decision of the Commission is:
(a) In violation of any constitutional or statutory provision;
(b) In excess of the statutory authority of the Commission;
(c) Made upon unlawful procedure;
(d) Affected by other error of law;
(e) Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative and
substantial evidence on the whole record; or
(f) Arbitrary or capricious or characterized by abuse of
discretion.
18. A petitioner who applies for a stay of the final decision of
the Commission shall file and serve a written motion for the stay
on the Commission and all parties of record to the proceeding at
the time of filing the petition for judicial review. The petitioner
must provide security before the court may issue a stay.
19. In determining whether to grant a stay, the court shall
consider the same factors as are considered for a preliminary
injunction under Rule 65 of the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure.
20. In making a ruling, the court shall:
(a) Give deference to the Commission; and
(b) Consider the risk to the public, if any, of staying the
decision of the Commission.
21. An aggrieved party may obtain a review of any final
judgment of the district court by appeal to the Nevada Supreme
Court. The appeal may be taken as in other civil cases.
Sec. 15. NRS 233.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.010 1. It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the
State of Nevada to protect the welfare, prosperity, health and peace
of all the people of the State, and to foster the right of all persons
reasonably to seek and obtain housing accommodations without
discrimination, distinction or restriction because of race, [religious
creed,] religion, color, age, sex, disability, familial status, sexual
orientation, gender identity or expression [,] or national origin . [or
ancestry.]
2. It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the State of
Nevada to protect the welfare, prosperity, health and peace of all the
people of the State, and to foster the right of all persons reasonably
to seek and be granted services in places of public accommodation
without discrimination, distinction or restriction because of race,
[religious creed,] religion, color, age, sex, disability, familial status,
sexual orientation, national origin [, ancestry] or gender identity or
expression.
-
*SB107*

– 11 –
3. It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the State of
Nevada to protect the welfare, prosperity, health and peace of all the
people of the State, and to foster the right of all persons reasonably
to seek, obtain and hold employment without discrimination,
distinction or restriction because of race, [religious creed,] religion,
color, age, sex, disability, familial status, sexual orientation, gender
identity or expression [,] or national origin . [or ancestry.] As used
in this subsection:
(a) “Protective hairstyle” includes, without limitation, hairstyles
such as natural hairstyles, afros, bantu knots, curls, braids, locks and
twists.
(b) “Race” includes traits associated with race, including,
without limitation, hair texture and protective hairstyles.
4. It is recognized that the people of this State should be
afforded full and accurate information concerning actual and alleged
practices of discrimination and acts of prejudice, and that such
information may provide the basis for formulating statutory
remedies of equal protection and opportunity for all citizens in this
State.
Sec. 16. NRS 233.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.020 As used in this chapter [:
1. “Administrator” means the Administrator of the
Commission.
2. “Commission” means the Nevada Equal Rights Commission
within the Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation.
3. “Disability” means, with respect to a person:
(a) A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one
or more of the major life activities of the person;
(b) A record of such an impairment; or
(c) Being regarded as having such an impairment.
4. “Member” means a member of the Nevada Equal Rights
Commission.] , unless the context otherwise requires, the words
and terms defined in sections 2 to 11, inclusive, of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 17. NRS 233.085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.085 The Governor may designate another agency to
perform the duties and functions of the Commission set forth in
NRS 233.150 [, 233.160, 233.165 and 233.170.] and 233.157 to
233.170, inclusive, and sections 12, 13 and 14 of this act.
Sec. 18. NRS 233.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.140 The Commission shall:
1. Foster mutual understanding and respect among all groups,
including, without limitation, those based on race, religion,
disability, ethnicity, sexual orientation and gender identity or
expression, and between the sexes in the State.
-
*SB107*

– 12 –
2. Aid in securing equal health and welfare services and
facilities for all the residents of the State without regard to race,
color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or
expression, age, disability , familial status or [nationality.] national
origin.
3. Study problems arising between groups within the State
which may result in tensions, discrimination or prejudice because of
race, color, [creed,] religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity
or expression, age, disability, familial status or national origin [or
ancestry,] and formulate and carry out programs of education and
disseminate information with the object of discouraging and
eliminating any such tensions, prejudices or discrimination.
4. Secure the cooperation of various groups, including, without
limitation, those based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability,
[nationality] familial status, national origin and ethnicity, veterans’
organizations, labor organizations, business and industry
organizations and fraternal, benevolent and service groups, in
educational campaigns devoted to the need for eliminating group
prejudice, racial or area tensions, intolerance or discrimination.
5. Cooperate with and seek the cooperation of federal and state
agencies and departments in carrying out projects within their
respective authorities to eliminate intergroup tensions and to
promote intergroup harmony.
6. Develop and carry out programs of education and
disseminate information as necessary to inform employers,
employees, employment agencies and job applicants about their
rights and responsibilities set forth in NRS 613.4353 to 613.4383,
inclusive.
Sec. 19. NRS 233.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.150 The Commission may:
1. Order its Administrator to:
(a) With regard to public accommodation, investigate tensions,
practices of discrimination and acts of prejudice against any person
or group because of race, color, [creed,] religion, sex, age,
disability, familial status, sexual orientation, national origin [,
ancestry] or gender identity or expression and may conduct hearings
with regard thereto.
(b) With regard to housing, investigate tensions, practices of
discrimination and acts of prejudice against any person or group
because of race, color, [creed,] religion, sex, age, disability, familial
status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression [,] or
national origin [or ancestry,] and may conduct hearings with regard
thereto.
(c) With regard to employment, investigate:
-
*SB107*

– 13 –
(1) Tensions, practices of discrimination and acts of
prejudice against any person or group because of race, color,
[creed,] religion, sex, age, disability, familial status, sexual
orientation, gender identity or expression [,] or national origin [or
ancestry,] and may conduct hearings with regard thereto; and
(2) Any unlawful employment practice by an employer
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 613.4353 to 613.4383, inclusive,
and may conduct hearings with regard thereto.
 As used in this paragraph, “race” includes traits associated with
race, including, without limitation, hair texture and protective
hairstyles, as defined in paragraph (a) of subsection 3 of
NRS 233.010.
2. Mediate between or reconcile the persons or groups involved
in those tensions, practices and acts.
3. Issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses or for the
production of documents or tangible evidence relevant to any
investigations or hearings conducted by the Commission.
4. Delegate its power to hold hearings and issue subpoenas to
any of its members or any hearing officer in its employ.
5. Initiate a complaint against an unlawful discriminatory
practice in housing.
6. Adopt reasonable regulations necessary for the Commission
to carry out the functions assigned to it by law.
Sec. 20. NRS 233.153 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.153 1. The Commission [shall not] may contract with or
enter into a memorandum of understanding with the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development for the
Commission to investigate and enforce laws relating to fair housing
as a certified agency . [unless the Legislature, by resolution or other
appropriate legislative measure, expressly authorizes the
Commission to do so.]
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Certified agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in 24
C.F.R. § 115.100(c). The term refers to the certification of an
agency as substantially equivalent as described in 42 U.S.C. §
3610(f)(3)(A) and 24 C.F.R. Part 115, Subpart B.
(b) “Memorandum of understanding” means the memorandum
of understanding described in 24 C.F.R. § [115.210.] 115.205.
Sec. 21. NRS 233.157 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.157 1. The Commission shall accept any complaint
alleging an unlawful discriminatory practice over which it has
jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter.
2. The Commission shall adopt regulations setting forth the
manner in which the Commission will process [any such] a
complaint [and] received pursuant to subsection 1.
-
*SB107*

– 14 –
3. If a complaint alleges an unlawful discriminatory practice
in employment or public accommodations, the Commission shall
determine whether to hold an informal settlement meeting or
conduct an investigation concerning the complaint.
4. If a complaint alleges an unlawful discriminatory practice
in housing, the Commission shall investigate the complaint and
shall, to the extent practicable, engage in conciliation with respect
to the complaint.
Sec. 22. NRS 233.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.160 1. A complaint which alleges an unlawful
discriminatory practice in:
(a) Housing must be filed with the Commission not later than 1
year after the date of the occurrence of the alleged practice or the
date on which the practice terminated.
(b) Employment or public accommodations must be filed with
the Commission not later than 300 days after the date of the
occurrence of the alleged practice.
 A complaint is timely if it is filed with an appropriate federal
agency within that period. A complainant shall not file a complaint
with the Commission if any other state or federal administrative
body or officer which has comparable jurisdiction to adjudicate
complaints of discriminatory practices has made a decision upon a
complaint based upon the same facts and legal theory.
2. The complainant shall specify in the complaint the alleged
unlawful practice. The complaint must be in writing and signed,
under oath, by the complainant.
3. If the complaint alleges an unlawful discriminatory practice
[in] :
(a) In housing, the Commission shall , not later than 10 days
after receiving the complaint, serve upon the complainant:
[(a)] (1) Notice that the complaint was filed with the
Commission;
[(b)] (2) A copy of the Commission’s procedures;
[(c)] (3) The information set forth in [subsection 5] sections 12
and 13 of [NRS 233.170; and
(d)] this act; and
(4) Information relating to the state and federal
administrative bodies and courts with which the complainant may
file the complaint.
(b) In employment, the Commission shall, as soon as
practicable after receiving the complaint, notify the complainant
in writing that the complainant may request the Commission to
issue a right-to-sue notice pursuant to NRS 613.412.
4. The Commission shall send to the [party against whom an
unlawful discriminatory practice is alleged:] respondent:
-
*SB107*

– 15 –
(a) A copy of the complaint;
(b) An explanation of the rights which are available to [that
party;] the respondent; and
(c) A copy of the Commission’s procedures.
 If the complaint alleges an unlawful discriminatory practice in
housing, the Commission shall comply with the requirements of this
subsection within 10 days after it receives the complaint.
5. [A person against whom an unlawful discriminatory practice
in housing is alleged] The respondent may file with the
Commission an answer to the complaint [filed against him or her]
not later than 10 days after the [person] respondent receives the
information described in subsection 4.
6. If a complaint alleges an unlawful discriminatory practice
in housing, a person who is not named as a respondent but who is
identified as a respondent in the course of the investigation may be
joined as an additional or substitute respondent upon written
notice from the Commission to that person.
7. The Commission shall notify each party to the complaint of
the limitation on the period of time during which a person may
apply to the district court for relief pursuant to NRS 613.430.
[7. If a person files a complaint pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 which alleges an unlawful discriminatory practice in
employment, the Commission shall, as soon as practicable after
receiving the complaint, notify in writing the person who filed the
complaint that the person may request the Commission to issue a
right-to-sue notice pursuant to NRS 613.412.]
8. For the purposes of paragraph (b) of subsection 1, an
unlawful discriminatory practice in employment which relates to
compensation occurs on:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), the date
prescribed by 42 U.S.C. § 2000e-5(e)(3)(A), as it existed on
January 1, 2019.
(b) If 42 U.S.C. § 2000e-5(e)(3)(A) is amended and the
Commission determines by regulation that the section, as amended,
provides greater protection for employees than the section as it
existed on January 1, 2019, the date prescribed by 42 U.S.C. §
2000e-5(e)(3)(A), as amended.
Sec. 23. NRS 233.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.165 1. [If the Commission determines to conduct] In
conducting an investigation of a complaint which alleges an
unlawful discriminatory practice in housing in accordance with the
regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 233.157, the Commission
[must:] shall:
(a) Begin [an] the investigation of the complaint within 30 days
after it receives the complaint.
-
*SB107*

– 16 –
(b) Complete its investigation of the complaint within 100 days
after it receives the complaint unless it is impracticable to do so.
(c) Make a final disposition of the complaint within 1 year after
the date it receives the complaint unless it is impracticable to do so.
2. If the Commission determines that it is impracticable to
complete an investigation or make a final disposition of a complaint
which alleges an unlawful discriminatory practice in housing within
the period prescribed in subsection 1, the Commission shall send to
the complainant and the [person against whom the complaint was
filed] respondent a statement setting forth its reasons for not
completing the investigation or making a final disposition of the
complaint within that period.
Sec. 24. NRS 233.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.170 1. When a complaint is filed whose allegations if
true would support a finding of an unlawful practice [, the] in
employment or public accommodations:
(a) The Commission shall determine whether to hold an
informal settlement meeting to attempt a settlement of the dispute in
accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 233.157.
If the Commission determines to hold an informal settlement
meeting, the Administrator may, to prepare for the meeting, request
from each party any information which is reasonably relevant to the
complaint. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,] If an
agreement is reached, no further action may be taken . [if the
parties agree to a settlement.
2.] (b) If an agreement is not reached at the informal settlement
meeting, the [Administrator] Commission shall determine whether
to conduct an investigation into the alleged unlawful practice in
accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 233.157.
After the investigation, if the [Administrator] Commission
determines that there is probable cause to believe that an unlawful
practice has occurred, the [Administrator] Commission shall
[attempt to mediate between or reconcile] engage in conciliation
with the parties. The [party against whom a complaint was filed]
respondent may agree to cease the unlawful practice [. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection 3, if] and provide any additional
relief as the parties may agree upon. If an agreement is reached, no
further action may be taken by the complainant or [by] the
Commission [.
3. If an agreement is reached by the parties in a case involving
a discriminatory practice in housing, the agreement must be
approved by the Commission. The agreement must be made public
unless the parties otherwise agree and the Commission determines
that disclosure is not necessary to further the purposes of chapter
118 of NRS.
-
*SB107*

– 17 –
4.] with regard to the matters alleged in the complaint.
(c) If the attempts at [mediation or] conciliation fail in a case
involving an unlawful practice in employment or public
accommodations, the Commission may hold a public hearing on the
matter [. After] in accordance with the requirements of chapter
233B of NRS.
2. If, after the hearing, [if] the Commission determines that
there is probable cause to believe that an unlawful practice has
occurred, [it may:] the Commission:
(a) [Serve] Shall serve a copy of its findings of fact within 10
calendar days upon [any person] the respondent found to have
engaged in the unlawful practice; and
(b) [Order] May order the [person] respondent to:
(1) Cease and desist from the unlawful practice. The order
must include, without limitation, the corrective action the [person]
respondent must take.
(2) In cases involving an unlawful employment practice,
restore all benefits and rights to which the [aggrieved person]
complainant is entitled, including, but not limited to, rehiring, back
pay for a period described in subsection [5,] 3, annual leave time,
sick leave time or pay, other fringe benefits and seniority, with
interest thereon from the date of the Commission’s decision at a rate
equal to the prime rate at the largest bank in Nevada, as ascertained
by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions, on January 1 or
July 1, as the case may be, immediately preceding the date of the
Commission’s decision, plus 2 percent. The rate of interest must be
adjusted accordingly on each January 1 and July 1 thereafter until
the judgment is satisfied.
(3) In cases involving an unlawful employment practice
relating to discrimination on the basis of sex, pay an amount
determined to be appropriate by the Commission for lost wages that
would have been earned in the absence of discrimination or other
economic damages resulting from the discrimination, including,
without limitation, lost payment for overtime, shift differential, cost
of living adjustments, merit increases or promotions, or other fringe
benefits.
(4) In cases involving an unlawful employment practice
committed by an employer with 50 or more employees that the
Commission determines was willful, pay a civil penalty of:
(I) For the first unlawful employment practice that the
[person] respondent has engaged in during the immediately
preceding 5 years which the Commission determines was willful,
not more than $5,000.
(II) For the second unlawful employment practice that the
[person] respondent has engaged in during the immediately
-
*SB107*

– 18 –
preceding 5 years which the Commission determines was willful,
not more than $10,000.
(III) For the third and any subsequent unlawful
employment practice that the [person] respondent has engaged in
during the immediately preceding 5 years which the Commission
determines was willful, not more than $15,000.
[5.] 3. For the purposes of subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b)
of subsection [4,] 2, the period for back pay must not exceed a
period beginning 2 years before the date on which the complaint
was filed and ending on the date the Commission issues an order
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection [4.] 2.
[6.] 4. Before imposing a civil penalty pursuant to
subparagraph (4) of paragraph (b) of subsection [4,] 2, the
Commission must allow the [person] respondent found to have
willfully engaged in an unlawful employment practice 30 days to
take corrective action from the date of service of the order made
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection [4.] 2. If the [person]
respondent takes such corrective action, the Commission shall not
impose the civil penalty.
[7. If the attempts at mediation or conciliation fail in a case
involving an unlawful housing practice:
(a) The complainant or the person against whom the complaint
was filed may elect to have the claims included in the complaint
decided in a court of competent jurisdiction. If the court determines
that the person against whom the complaint was filed has committed
an unlawful housing practice, the court may:
(1) Award to the complainant actual damages and, within the
limitations prescribed by federal law, punitive damages.
(2) Award to the prevailing party costs and reasonable
attorney’s fees.
(3) Order such other relief as the court deems appropriate,
including, but not limited to:
(I) Ordering a permanent or temporary injunction;
(II) Issuing a temporary restraining order; or
(III) Enjoining the defendant from continuing the
unlawful practice or taking other such affirmative action.
(b) If an election is not made pursuant to paragraph (a), the
Commission shall hold a public hearing on the matter. After the
hearing, if the Commission determines that an unlawful practice has
occurred, it may:
(1) Serve a copy of its findings of fact within 10 days upon
any person found to have engaged in the unlawful practice;
(2) Order the person to cease and desist from the unlawful
practice;
(3) Award to the complainant actual damages; and
-
*SB107*

– 19 –
(4) Impose a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 upon the
person who committed the unlawful discriminatory practice.
8.] 5. If, after the hearing, the Commission determines that
there is no probable cause to believe that an unlawful practice has
occurred, the Commission shall dismiss the matter and make the
dismissal public.
6. The order of the Commission is a final decision in a
contested case for the purpose of judicial review. If the [person]
respondent fails to comply with the Commission’s order, the
Commission shall apply to the district court for an order compelling
such compliance, but failure or delay on the part of the Commission
does not prejudice the right of an aggrieved party to judicial review.
The court shall issue the order unless it finds that the Commission’s
findings or order are not supported by substantial evidence or are
otherwise arbitrary or capricious. If the court upholds the
Commission’s order and finds that the [person] respondent has
violated the order by failing to cease and desist from the unlawful
practice or to make the payment ordered, the court shall award the
[aggrieved party] complainant actual damages for any economic
loss and no more.
[9.] 7. After the Commission has held a public hearing and
rendered a decision, the complainant is barred from proceeding on
the same facts and legal theory before any other administrative body
or officer.
[10.] 8. For the purposes of this section, an unlawful
employment practice shall be deemed to be willful if a person
engages in the practice with knowledge that it is unlawful or with
reckless indifference to whether it is lawful or unlawful.
Sec. 25. NRS 233.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.175 1. The Commission shall accept a complaint that
alleges that a local elected officer has engaged in an unlawful
employment practice of discrimination pursuant to Title VII of the
Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq., or NRS
613.330 and take appropriate action.
2. The Commission shall present a complaint to the district
court pursuant to NRS 283.440 if the Commission determines after
a hearing held pursuant to [subsection 3 of] NRS 233.170 that a
local elected officer has engaged in an unlawful employment
practice of discrimination pursuant to Title VII of the Civil Rights
Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq., or NRS 613.330 and that
the discriminatory practice that forms the basis of such a complaint
is severe or pervasive such that removal from office is an
appropriate remedy. In addition to any monetary penalties, the
Commission may impose upon the local elected officer any other
reasonable sanction, including, without limitation, a requirement to
-
*SB107*

– 20 –
complete a course or training related to the unlawful employment
practice of discrimination.
3. Any fine or penalty required to be paid by a local elected
officer because such officer was determined to have engaged in an
unlawful employment practice of discrimination pursuant to
subsection 2 must be assessed against such officer in his or her
personal capacity, and may not be paid with public money or
contributions received pursuant to chapter 294A of NRS. Except for
a fine or a penalty, no damages may be assessed against the local
elected officer in his or her personal capacity.
4. As used in this section, “local elected officer” means a
person who holds a local government office to which the person was
elected.
Sec. 26. NRS 233.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.180 If, after the Administrator has conducted a preliminary
investigation into an alleged unlawful discriminatory practice in
housing, employment or public accommodations, the Commission
determines that the practice will cause immediate and irreparable
harm to any [person] aggrieved [by the practice,] person, the
Commission, [after the informal meeting and] before holding a
public hearing upon the matter, may apply on behalf of such person
to the district court for a temporary restraining order or preliminary
injunction as provided in the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure.
Sec. 27. NRS 233.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233.190 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section or
NRS 239.0115, or paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of section 12 of
this act, any information gathered by the Commission in the course
of its investigation of an alleged unlawful discriminatory practice in
housing, employment or public accommodations is confidential.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the
Commission may disclose information gathered pursuant to
subsection 1 to:
(a) Any governmental entity as appropriate or necessary to carry
out its duties pursuant to this chapter; or
(b) Any other person if the information is provided in a manner
which does not include any information that may be used to identify
the complainant, the [party against whom the unlawful
discriminatory practice is alleged] respondent or any person who
provided information to the Commission during the investigation.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
Commission shall disclose information gathered pursuant to
subsection 1 to the complainant and the [party against whom the
unlawful discriminatory practice is alleged] respondent if:
(a) Each has consented to such disclosure; or
-
*SB107*

– 21 –
(b) The Commission has determined to conduct a hearing on the
matter or apply for a temporary restraining order or an injunction or
an action has been filed in court concerning the complaint.
4. The Commission may not disclose to the complainant or the
[party against whom the unlawful discriminatory practice is
alleged:] respondent:
(a) Any information obtained during negotiations for a
settlement or attempts at mediating or conciliating the complaint.
(b) Any investigative notes or reports made by the Commission.
(c) Any information that may be used to identify a person who
provided information to the Commission during the investigation
and who has requested anonymity.
5. After the filing of a complaint with the Commission, access
to information related to the complaint must be limited only to such
staff of the Commission as is necessary to carry out the duties of the
Commission relating to the complaint. Such staff shall not disclose
such information to the other officers and employees of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation, including,
without limitation, supervisors and the Director of the Department,
unless the disclosure is necessary to carry out the duties of the
Commission relating to the complaint.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this section or NRS
239.0115, or paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of section 12 of this
act, if the Commission’s attempts at mediating or conciliating the
cause of the grievance succeed, the information gathered pursuant to
subsection 1 must remain confidential.
7. If the Commission proceeds with a hearing or applies for
injunctive relief, confidentiality concerning any information, except
negotiations for a settlement or attempts at mediating or conciliating
the cause of the grievance, is no longer required.
Sec. 28. NRS 233B.039 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.039 1. The following agencies are entirely exempted
from the requirements of this chapter:
(a) The Governor.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 and NRS
209.221 and 209.2473, the Department of Corrections.
(c) The Nevada System of Higher Education.
(d) The Office of the Military.
(e) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 368A.140 and 463.765,
the Nevada Gaming Commission.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 425.620, the Division
of Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services.
-
*SB107*

– 22 –
(h) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 422.390, the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 533.365, the Office of
the State Engineer.
(j) The Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry acting to enforce the provisions of
NRS 618.375.
(k) The Administrator of the Division of Industrial Relations of
the Department of Business and Industry in establishing and
adjusting the schedule of fees and charges for accident benefits
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 616C.260.
(l) The Board to Review Claims in adopting resolutions to carry
out its duties pursuant to NRS 445C.310.
(m) The Silver State Health Insurance Exchange.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and NRS
391.323, the Department of Education, the Board of the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program and the Commission on Professional
Standards in Education are subject to the provisions of this chapter
for the purpose of adopting regulations but not with respect to any
contested case.
3. The special provisions of:
(a) Chapter 612 of NRS for the adoption of an emergency
regulation or the distribution of regulations by and the judicial
review of decisions of the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation;
(b) Chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS for the
determination of contested claims;
(c) Chapter 233 of NRS for the judicial review of decisions of
the Nevada Equal Rights Commission concerning an unlawful
discriminatory practice in housing;
(d) Chapter 91 of NRS for the judicial review of decisions of the
Administrator of the Securities Division of the Office of the
Secretary of State; and
[(d)] (e) NRS 90.800 for the use of summary orders in
contested cases,
 prevail over the general provisions of this chapter.
4. The provisions of NRS 233B.122, 233B.124, 233B.125 and
233B.126 do not apply to the Department of Health and Human
Services in the adjudication of contested cases involving the
issuance of letters of approval for health facilities and agencies.
5. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any order for immediate action, including, but not limited
to, quarantine and the treatment or cleansing of infected or infested
animals, objects or premises, made under the authority of the State
-
*SB107*

– 23 –
Board of Agriculture, the State Board of Health, or any other agency
of this State in the discharge of a responsibility for the preservation
of human or animal health or for insect or pest control;
(b) An extraordinary regulation of the State Board of Pharmacy
adopted pursuant to NRS 453.2184;
(c) A regulation adopted by the State Board of Education
pursuant to NRS 388.255 or 394.1694;
(d) The judicial review of decisions of the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada;
(e) The adoption, amendment or repeal of policies by the
Rehabilitation Division of the Department of Employment, Training
and Rehabilitation pursuant to NRS 426.561 or 615.178;
(f) The adoption or amendment of a rule or regulation to be
included in the State Plan for Services for Victims of Crime by the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
NRS 217.130;
(g) The adoption, amendment or repeal of rules governing the
conduct of contests and exhibitions of unarmed combat by the
Nevada Athletic Commission pursuant to NRS 467.075;
(h) The adoption, amendment or repeal of standards of content
and performance for courses of study in public schools by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools and the
State Board of Education pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(i) The adoption, amendment or repeal of the statewide plan to
allocate money from the Fund for a Resilient Nevada created by
NRS 433.732 established by the Department of Health and Human
Services pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734;
or
(j) The adoption or amendment of a data request by the
Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to NRS 687B.404.
6. The State Board of Parole Commissioners is subject to the
provisions of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations but
not with respect to any contested case.
7. The Department of Corrections is subject to the provisions
of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations relating to
fiscal policy, correspondence with inmates and visitation with
inmates of the Department of Corrections.
Sec. 29. Chapter 118 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 30 to 33, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 30. “Aggrieved person” means any person who:
1. Claims to have been injured by an unlawful discriminatory
practice in housing; or
2. Believes that he or she will be injured by an unlawful
discriminatory practice in housing that is about to occur.
-
*SB107*

– 24 –
Sec. 31. “Unlawful discriminatory practice in housing”
means a practice prohibited by NRS 118.100 and sections 32 and
33 of this act.
Sec. 32. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is
an unlawful discriminatory practice in housing for any person to:
(a) Refuse to rent or lease or refuse to negotiate for the rental
or lease of, or otherwise make unavailable, a dwelling to an
applicant because of any arrest record if the applicant has not
been prosecuted in relation to any such arrest;
(b) Make, print or publish, or cause to be made, printed or
published, any notice, statement or advertisement with respect to
the rental or lease of a dwelling that indicates any preference,
limitation or discrimination, or intention to make any preference,
limitation or discrimination, on the basis of an applicant’s arrest
record in violation of paragraph (a); or
(c) Evict a tenant on the basis of an arrest record.
2. A person who is subject to the provisions of this section
shall provide to each applicant for the rental or lease of a dwelling
information on:
(a) The provisions of this section and NRS 118.110 and
118.120;
(b) How the applicant may appeal a denial for a rental or lease
of a dwelling in public housing to a housing authority; and
(c) How the applicant may file a complaint with the
Commission pursuant to NRS 233.160, if the applicant believes
that his or her application was denied on the basis of an unlawful
discriminatory practice in housing.
3. The provisions of this section:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), apply to the
rental or lease, including, without limitation, a week-to-week
tenancy, of any dwelling that is owned by a natural person and
contains five or more dwelling units.
(b) Do not apply to any action taken by a person:
(1) Pursuant to any federal or state law or regulation that
requires the person to inquire into or conduct a background check
to determine the arrest record of an applicant and exclude certain
applicants based on certain types of criminal history, including,
without limitation, the provisions of 42 U.S.C. § 13663, 24 C.F.R.
§ 982.553 and NRS 315.031.
(2) Who makes available for rent a dwelling for tenancy on
a week-to-week basis to determine whether an applicant has any
outstanding felony warrants pending against him or her.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Applicant” means a person who:
-
*SB107*

– 25 –
(1) Seeks information about, visits or applies to rent or
lease a dwelling;
(2) Applies for a housing rental assistance program,
including, without limitation, the Housing Choice Voucher
Program pursuant to section 8 of the United States Housing Act of
1937, 42 U.S.C. § 1437f; or
(3) Seeks to be added to an existing lease for a dwelling.
(b) “Arrest record” means any information indicating that a
person has been apprehended, detained, taken into custody, held
for investigation or restrained by a law enforcement department or
military authority due to an accusation or suspicion that the
person committed a crime. The term includes pending criminal
charges where an accusation has not resulted in a final judgment,
acquittal, conviction, plea, dismissal or withdrawal.
(c) “Background check” means any report regarding the
arrest record of a person intended to obtain the person’s record of
criminal history.
(d) “Dwelling”:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2),
means:
(I) Public housing;
(II) Any housing that is rented or leased to a tenant
pursuant to a contract with a housing authority; or
(III) Any housing which accepts rental payments of
vouchers from a federal, state or local housing voucher program.
(2) Does not include:
(I) A manufactured home; or
(II) A single-family house owned by a natural person or
any other housing that is owned by a natural person and has four
or fewer dwelling units.
(e) “Dwelling unit” means a building or a portion of a
building planned, designed or used as a residence for one family
only, living independently of other families or persons, and having
its own bathroom and housekeeping facilities included in the unit.
(f) “Housing authority” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 315.021.
(g) “Public housing” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 315.021.
Sec. 33. 1. It is an unlawful discriminatory practice in
housing for any person to:
(a) Require a guarantor on a contract to rent or lease a
dwelling to provide proof of income in an amount greater than two
times the monthly rent or lease;
(b) Refuse to rent or lease or refuse to negotiate for the rental
or lease of, or otherwise make unavailable, a dwelling to an
-
*SB107*

– 26 –
applicant because a guarantor has not provided proof of income in
an amount greater than two times the monthly rent or lease; or
(c) Make, print or publish, or cause to be made, printed or
published, any notice, statement or advertisement with respect to
the rental or lease of a dwelling that indicates any requirement for
a guarantor on a contract to rent or lease a dwelling to provide
proof of income in an amount greater than two times the monthly
rent or lease.
2. A person who is subject to the provisions of this section
shall provide to each applicant for the rental or lease of a dwelling
information on:
(a) The provisions of this section and NRS 118.110 and
118.120;
(b) How the applicant may appeal a denial for a rental or lease
of a dwelling in public housing to a housing authority; and
(c) How the applicant may file a complaint with the
Commission pursuant to NRS 233.160, if the applicant believes
that his or her application has been denied on the basis of an
unlawful discriminatory practice in housing.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Guarantor” means a person who cosigns on a contract to
rent or lease a dwelling or dwelling unit.
(b) “Proof of income” means documentation of the amount of
money a person earns or receives from any source, including,
without limitation, a pay stub, tax return, letter of employment,
unemployment documentation, pension statement, social security
award letter and workers’ compensation or disability insurance
statement.
Sec. 34. NRS 118.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.020 1. It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the
State of Nevada that all people in the State have equal opportunity
to inherit, purchase, lease, rent, sell, hold and convey real property
without discrimination, distinction or restriction because of race,
[religious creed,] religion, color, national origin, disability, sexual
orientation, gender identity or expression, [ancestry,] familial status
or sex.
2. Nothing in [this chapter] NRS 118.010 to 118.120,
inclusive, and sections 30 to 33, inclusive, of this act shall be
deemed to render enforceable a conveyance or other contract made
by a person who lacks the capacity to contract.
Sec. 35. NRS 118.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.030 As used in NRS 118.010 to 118.120, inclusive, and
sections 30 to 33, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 118.040 to 118.093,
-
*SB107*

– 27 –
inclusive, and sections 30 and 31 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 36. NRS 118.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.045 1. “Disability” means, with respect to a person:
[1.] (a) A physical or mental impairment that substantially
limits one or more of the major life activities of the person;
[2.] (b) A record of such an impairment; or
[3.] (c) Being regarded as having such an impairment.
2. The term does not include any current illegal use of or
addiction to a controlled substance, as defined in 21 U.S.C.
§ 802(6).
Sec. 37. NRS 118.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.060 [1.] “Dwelling” means any building, structure or
portion thereof which is occupied as, or designed or intended for
occupancy as, a residence by one or more families, and any vacant
land which is offered for sale or lease for the construction or
location thereon of any such building, structure or portion thereof.
[2. “Dwelling” does not include:
(a) A single-family house sold or rented by an owner if:
(1) The owner does not own more than three single-family
houses at any one time or the owner does not own any interest in,
nor is there owned or reserved on his or her behalf, under any
express or voluntary agreement, title to or any right to all or a
portion of the proceeds from the sale or rental of, more than three
single-family houses at any one time; and
(2) The house was sold or rented without the use in any
manner of the sales or rental facilities or the sales or rental services
of any real estate broker, real estate broker-salesperson or real estate
salesperson licensed pursuant to chapter 645 of NRS.
(b) Rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters
occupied or intended to be occupied by not more than four families
living independently of each other if the owner actually maintains
and occupies one of the living quarters as his or her residence and
the owner has not within the preceding 12-month period
participated:
(1) As the principal in three or more transactions involving
the sale or rental of any dwelling or any interest therein; or
(2) As an agent, otherwise than in the sale of his or her own
personal residence in providing sales or rental facilities or sales or
rental services in two or more transactions involving the sale or
rental of any dwelling or any interest therein.
3. The sale of a single-family house by an owner not residing
in that house at the time of the sale or who was not the most recent
resident of that house before the sale does not bring the house within
-
*SB107*

– 28 –
the definition of “dwelling” unless there is more than one such sale
within any 24-month period.]
Sec. 38. NRS 118.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.080 “Person” includes [the] :
1. One or more natural persons, corporations, partnerships,
associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual
companies, joint stock companies, trustees, trustees in cases under
Title 11 of the United States Code, receivers or fiduciaries;
2. The State of Nevada ; and [all]
3. All political subdivisions and agencies [thereof.] of the
State.
Sec. 39. NRS 118.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.100 [A]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, a
person shall not, because of race, [religious creed,] religion, color,
national origin, [disability,] sexual orientation, gender identity or
expression, [ancestry,] familial status , [or] sex [:] or disability,
including, without limitation, the disability of a buyer or renter or
any person who may reside in a dwelling after it is sold, rented or
made available, or because the buyer or renter is associated with a
person who is, or is perceived to be, a member of any class of
persons protected by the provisions of NRS 118.010 to 118.120,
inclusive, and sections 30 to 33, inclusive, of this act:
[1.] (a) Refuse to sell or rent or refuse to negotiate for the sale
or rental of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling to
any person.
[2.] (b) Discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions
or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, including the amount of
breakage or brokerage fees, deposits or other undue penalties, or in
the provision of services or facilities in connection therewith.
[3.] (c) Make, print or publish, or cause to be made, printed or
published, any notice, statement or advertisement with respect to the
sale or rental of a dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation
or discrimination, or an intention to make any preference, limitation
or discrimination. As used in this [subsection,] paragraph,
“dwelling” includes a house, room or unit described in [subsection 2
or 3 of NRS 118.060.] paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 5.
[4.] (d) Represent to any person because of race, [religious
creed,] religion, color, national origin, disability, sexual orientation,
gender identity or expression, [ancestry,] familial status or sex that
any dwelling is not available for inspection, sale or rental when the
dwelling is in fact so available.
[5.] (e) For profit, induce or attempt to induce any person to sell
or rent any dwelling by representations regarding the entry or
prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person of a particular
-
*SB107*

– 29 –
race, [religious creed,] religion, color, national origin, disability,
sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, [ancestry,] familial
status or sex.
[6. Coerce,]
(f) Deny any person access to or membership or participation
in any multiple-listing service, real estate brokers’ organization or
other service, organization or facility relating to the business of
selling or renting dwellings, or discriminate against any person in
the terms or conditions of such access, membership or
participation.
2. A person shall not discriminate against any person in
making available a residential real estate-related transaction, or in
the terms or conditions of such a transaction.
3. A person shall not coerce, intimidate, threaten or interfere
with any person in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of
that person having exercised or enjoyed or aided or encouraged any
other person in the exercise or enjoyment of, any right granted or
protected in [this chapter.] NRS 118.010 to 118.120, inclusive, and
sections 30 to 33, inclusive, of this act.
4. The provisions of this section:
(a) Do not prohibit a person engaged in the business of
furnishing appraisals of real property from considering factors
other than race, religion, color, national origin, sexual
orientation, gender identity or expression, familial status, sex or
disability in performing an appraisal.
(b) Do not prohibit a religious organization, association or
society, or a non-profit institution or organization operated,
supervised or controlled by or in conjunction with a religious
organization, association or society, from limiting the sale, rental
or occupancy of any dwelling which it owns or operates for other
than a commercial purpose to persons of the same religion or
from giving preferences to such persons, unless membership in the
religion is restricted on account of race, color or national origin.
(c) Do not prohibit a private club which is not open to the
public and which, as an incident to its primary purposes, provides
lodging that it owns or operates for other than a commercial
purpose from limiting the rental or occupancy of those lodgings to
its members or from giving preference to its members.
(d) With regard to the prohibition against discrimination based
on familial status, do not apply to housing for older persons.
5. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) or (f) of
subsection 1 or subsection 2, 3 or 6, the provisions of this section
do not apply to:
(a) A single-family house sold or rented by a private individual
owner if:
-
*SB107*

– 30 –
(1) The private individual owner owns four or fewer single-
family houses;
(2) The private individual owner does not own any interest
in, and there is not owned or reserved on his or her behalf, under
any express or voluntary agreement, title to or any right to any
portion of the proceeds from the sale or rental of more than three
single-family houses; and
(3) The house is sold or rented without:
(I) The use in any manner of the sales or rental facilities
or services of any real estate broker, agent or salesperson licensed
under chapter 645 of NRS, other person in the business of selling
or renting dwellings or the employee or agent of such a real estate
broker, agent or salesperson or other person; and
(II) The publication, posting or mailing of any
advertisement or written notice in violation of paragraph (c) of
subsection 1.
(b) Rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters
occupied or intended to be occupied by not more than four
families living independently of each other, if the owner maintains
and occupies one of the living quarters as his or her residence.
6. In the event of the sale of a single-family house by a
private individual owner who does not reside in the house at the
time of the sale or who was not the most recent resident of the
house before the sale, the exemption from the provisions of this
section set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 5 applies only with
respect to one such sale within any 24-month period.
7. The provisions of this section do not prohibit the use by
any person of such attorneys, escrow agents, commissioned
abstracters, title companies or other professional assistance as
necessary to perfect or transfer title to real property.
8. For the purposes of this section, a person shall be deemed
to be in the business of selling or renting dwellings if the person:
(a) Has, within the immediately preceding 12 months,
participated as a principal in three or more transactions involving
the sale or rental of any dwelling or any interest in a dwelling;
(b) Has, within the immediately preceding 12 months,
participated as an agent, other than in the sale of his or her own
residence, in providing sales or rental facilities or services in two
or more transactions involving the sale or rental of any dwelling
or any interest in a dwelling; or
(c) Is the owner of any dwelling occupied by, or designed or
intended for occupancy by, five or more families.
9. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(a) “Housing for older persons” means housing that is:
-
*SB107*

– 31 –
(1) Provided under any state or federal program which the
United States Secretary of Housing and Urban Development
determines is specifically designed and operated to assist elderly
persons;
(2) Intended for and occupied solely by persons who are 62
years of age or older; or
(3) Intended and operated for occupancy by persons who
are 55 years of age or older and:
(I) At least 80 percent of the occupied units are occupied
by at least one person who is 55 years of age or older; and
(II) For which there is compliance with applicable rules
for verification of occupancy.
(b) “Residential real estate-related transaction” means:
(1) The making or purchasing of loans or providing other
financial assistance for purchasing, constructing, improving,
repairing or maintaining a dwelling;
(2) The making or purchasing of loans or providing other
financial assistance secured by residential real estate; or
(3) The selling, brokering or appraising of residential real
estate.
Sec. 40. NRS 118.101 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.101 1. A person may not refuse to [:
(a) Authorize] authorize a person with a disability to make
reasonable modifications to a dwelling which he or she occupies or
will occupy if:
[(1)] (a) The person with the disability pays for the
modifications; and
[(2)] (b) The modifications [are] may be necessary to
[ensure that] afford the person with the disability [may use and
enjoy] the full enjoyment of the dwelling . [; or
(b) Make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies,
practices or services if those accommodations are necessary to
ensure that the person with the disability may use and enjoy the
dwelling.]
2. A landlord may, as a condition for the authorization of such
a modification, reasonably require the person who requests the
authorization, upon the termination of his or her occupancy, to
restore the interior of the dwelling to the condition that existed
before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a landlord
may not increase the amount of a security deposit the landlord
customarily requires a person to deposit because that person has
requested authorization to modify a dwelling pursuant to
subsection 1.
-
*SB107*

– 32 –
4. If a person requests authorization to modify a dwelling
pursuant to subsection 1, the landlord may require that person to
deposit an additional security deposit in addition to the amount the
landlord usually requires if the additional security deposit:
(a) Is necessary to ensure the restoration of the dwelling
pursuant to subsection 2;
(b) Does not exceed the actual cost of the restoration; and
(c) Is collected over a reasonable period and deposited by the
landlord in an interest-bearing account. Any interest earned on the
additional amount must be paid to the person who requested
the authorization.
5. A person may not refuse to make reasonable
accommodations in rules, policies, practices or services which may
be necessary to afford a person with a disability equal opportunity
to use and enjoy a dwelling.
6. As used in this section, “security deposit” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 118A.240.
Sec. 41. NRS 118.103 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.103 1. A covered multifamily dwelling which is
designed and constructed for occupancy on or after [March 13,
1991,] October 1, 2025, must be constructed in such a manner that
the primary entrance to the dwelling [contains at least one entrance
which] is accessible to a person with a disability unless it is
impracticable to so design or construct the dwelling because of the
terrain or unusual characteristics of the site upon which it is
constructed.
2. [A] Such a covered multifamily dwelling [which contains at
least one entrance which is accessible to a person with a disability]
must be constructed in such a manner that:
(a) The [common] areas of the dwelling intended for public use
or common use are readily accessible to and usable by a person
with a disability;
(b) The doors of the dwelling are sufficiently wide to allow a
person with a disability to enter and exit in a wheelchair;
(c) The units of the dwelling contain:
(1) An accessible route into and through the dwelling;
(2) Reinforcements in the bathroom walls so that bars for use
by a person with a disability may be installed therein; and
(3) Kitchens and bathrooms which are usable by a person in
a wheelchair and in which such a person [in a wheelchair] may
maneuver; and
(d) The light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats or any
other environmental controls in the units of the dwelling are placed
in such a manner that they are accessible to a person in a
wheelchair.
-
*SB107*

– 33 –
3. As used in this section, “covered multifamily dwelling”
means:
(a) A building which consists of four or more units and contains
at least one elevator; [or] and
(b) The units located on the ground floor of any other building
which consists of four or more units.
Sec. 42. NRS 118.105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.105 1. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a]
A landlord [may] must not refuse to rent a dwelling subject to the
provisions of chapter 118A of NRS to a person with a disability
solely because [an] a service animal which affords the person an
equal opportunity to use and enjoy the dwelling will be residing
with the prospective tenant in the dwelling . [if the animal assists,
supports or provides service to the person with a disability.]
2. [A landlord may require proof that an animal assists,
supports or provides service to the person with a disability. This
requirement may be satisfied, without limitation, by a statement
from a provider of health care that the animal performs a function
that ameliorates the effects of the person’s disability.] As used in
this section, “service animal” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 426.097.
Sec. 43. NRS 118.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.110 Any aggrieved person [who claims to have been
injured by a discriminatory housing practice or who believes that he
or she will be injured by such a practice that is about to occur] may
file a complaint with the Commission in the manner prescribed in
NRS 233.160 [.] and avail himself or herself of the rights and
remedies set forth in NRS 233.160 and sections 12, 13 and 14 of
this act.
Sec. 44. NRS 118.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.120 [Any]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an aggrieved
person may commence an action in any district court in this state to
enforce the provisions of NRS 118.100, 207.300, 207.310, 645.321
or 645C.480 or section 32 or 33 of this act not [less] more than 1
year after the date of the occurrence or termination of an alleged
violation of any of those provisions. If the court determines that the
provisions of any of those sections have been violated by the
defendant, and that the plaintiff has been injured thereby, it may
enjoin the defendant from continued violation or may take such
other affirmative action as may be appropriate, and, in the case of a
prevailing plaintiff, may award to the plaintiff actual damages,
punitive damages, court costs and a reasonable attorney’s fee.
2. The limitation on commencing an action set forth in
subsection 1 is tolled by the filing of a complaint with the
-
*SB107*

– 34 –
Commission and during the pendency of the complaint before the
Commission.
Sec. 45. NRS 118.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.120 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an
aggrieved person may commence an action in any district court in
this state to enforce the provisions of NRS 118.100, 207.300,
207.310, 645.321 or 645C.480 or section 32 or 33 of this act not
more than 1 year after the date of the occurrence or termination of
an alleged violation of any of those provisions. If the court
determines that the provisions of any of those sections have been
violated by the defendant, and that the plaintiff has been injured
thereby, it may enjoin the defendant from continued violation or
may take such other affirmative action as may be appropriate, [and,
in the case of a prevailing plaintiff, may] including, without
limitation, an award [to the plaintiff] of actual damages [, punitive
damages, court costs and a] and such civil penalties as provided in
section 12 of this act. The court may award the prevailing party
reasonable attorney’s [fee.] fees and costs, except that no such fees
or costs may be awarded against the State of Nevada unless, upon
a motion by a party, the court determines that the State of Nevada
acted in violation of Rule 11 of the Nevada Rules of Civil
Procedure.
2. The limitation on commencing an action set forth in
subsection 1 is tolled by the filing of a complaint with the
Commission and during the pendency of the complaint before the
Commission.
3. An aggrieved person may commence a civil action under
this section regardless of whether the person has filed a complaint
under NRS 118.110, unless the person has entered into a
conciliation agreement concerning the complaint or the
Commission has commenced a hearing pursuant to section 12 of
this act with respect to the matters alleged in the complaint.
Sec. 46. Chapter 118A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a rental agreement provides for payment by the tenant to
the landlord for any utility service, the landlord shall provide the
tenant with a statement containing:
(a) The actual charges incurred by the landlord for the utility
service for the dwelling unit of the applicable tenant; and
(b) The portion of the utility service charges for the utility
service that are allocated to the tenant.
2. As used in this section, “utility service” includes, without
limitation, electricity, telephone service, cable or satellite television
service, gas, water, wastewater removal, solid waste removal or
Internet service.
-
*SB107*

– 35 –
Sec. 47. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 11, inclusive, 15, 16, 18 to 21, inclusive, 26, 28
to 42, inclusive, 44 and 46 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
3. Sections 12, 13, 14, 17, 22 to 25, inclusive, 27, 43 and 45 of
this act become effective on the date the Governor declares that the
Federal Government has determined that certain provisions of NRS
provide rights and remedies for alleged discriminatory housing
practices substantially equivalent to federal law.
H
-
*SB107*